Hawaii statutes.
[§663E-12] Stay of
action. On motion by a governmental agency involved in a drug
investigation or prosecution, an action brought under this chapter shall be
stayed until the completion of the criminal investigation or prosecution that
gave rise to the motion for a stay of the action. [L 2004, c 44, pt of §13]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next